District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.61

Repealed

Reduction of stated capital — Procedure; effect of approval; filing.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 205, ch. 269, § 61
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 85-254, § 14
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(v), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-925.
1981 Ed., § 29-361.
2001 Ed., § 29-101.61.